Maryland, session 2025, SB0777.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Corporations and Associations
5–6B–26.1.
(a) (1) In this section[, “reserve] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(2) “RESERVE study” means a study of the reserves required for future
major repairs and replacement of the common elements of a cooperative housing
corporation that:
[(1)] (I) Identifies each structural, mechanical, electrical, and plumbing
component of the common elements and any other components that are the responsibility
of the cooperative housing corporation to repair and replace;
[(2)] (II) States the normal useful life and the estimated remaining useful
life of each identified component;
[(3)] (III) States the estimated cost of repair or replacement of each
identified component; and
[(4)] (IV) States the estimated annual reserve amount necessary to
accomplish any identified future repair or replacement.
(3) “UPDATED RESERVE STUDY” MEANS, FOR THE COMMON
ELEMENTS SINCE THE PRIOR RESERVE STUDY WAS COMPLETED:
(I) ANALYZING ANY WORK PERFORMED;
(II) REVISING REPLACEMENT COST, REMAINING LIFE, AND
USEFUL LIFE ESTIMATES; AND
(III) IDENTIFYING:
1. WORK PERFORMED AND AMOUNTS SPENT; AND
2. WHETHER ANY MAINTENANCE CONTRACTS ARE IN
PLACE.
(b) (1) This subsection applies only to a cooperative housing corporation
established in:

SENATE BILL 777 3
(i) Prince George’s County on or after October 1, 2020;
(ii) Montgomery County on or after October 1, 2021; or
(iii) Any county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery
County on or after October 1, 2022.
(2) The governing body of the cooperative housing corporation shall have
an independent reserve study completed not less than 30 calendar days before the first
meeting of the cooperative housing corporation at which the members other than the owner
have a majority of votes in the cooperative housing corporation.
(3) The governing body shall have an updated reserve study completed
within 5 years after the date of the initial reserve study conducted under paragraph (2) of
this subsection, which shall be updated at least every 5 years thereafter.
(c) (1) (i) This paragraph applies only to a cooperative housing corporation
established in Prince George’s County before October 1, 2020.
(ii) If the governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has
had a reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall have
an updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and
at least every 5 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has
not had a reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall
have a reserve study conducted on or before October 1, 2021, and an updated reserve study
at least every 5 years thereafter.
(2) (i) This paragraph applies only to a cooperative housing corporation
established in Montgomery County before October 1, 2021.
(ii) If the governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has
had a reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall have
an updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and
at least every 5 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has
not had a reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall
have a reserve study conducted on or before October 1, 2022, and an updated reserve study
at least every 5 years thereafter.
(3) (i) This paragraph applies to a cooperative housing corporation
established in any county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery County before
October 1, 2022.

SENATE BILL 777
(ii) If the governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has
had a reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall have
an updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and
at least every 5 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has
not had a reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall
have a reserve study conducted on or before October 1, 2023, and an updated reserve study
at least every 5 years thereafter.
(d) Each reserve study AND, AS APPLICABLE, UPDATED RESERVE STUDY
required under this section shall:
(1) Be prepared by a person who:
(i) Has prepared at least 30 reserve studies within the prior 3
calendar years;
(ii) Has participated in the preparation of at least 30 reserve studies
within the prior 3 calendar years while employed by a firm that prepares reserve studies;
(iii) Holds a current license from the State Board of Architects or the
State Board for Professional Engineers; or
(iv) Is currently designated as a reserve specialist by the Community
Association Institute or as a professional reserve analyst by the Association of Professional
Reserve Analysts;
(2) Be available for inspection and copying by any unit owner;
(3) Be reviewed by the governing body of the cooperative housing
corporation in connection with the preparation of the annual proposed budget; and
(4) Be summarized for submission with the annual proposed budget to the
unit owners.
(e) (1) To the extent that a reserve study conducted in accordance with this
section indicates a need to budget for reserves, the budget shall include:
[(1)] (I) For the capital components, the current estimated:
[(i)] 1. Replacement cost;
[(ii)] 2. Remaining life; and
[(iii)] 3. Useful life;

SENATE BILL 777 5
[(2)] (II) The amount of accumulated cash reserves set aside for the
repair, replacement, or restoration of capital components as of the beginning of the fiscal
year in which the reserve study is conducted and the amount of the expected contribution
to the reserve fund for the fiscal year;
[(3)] (III) A statement describing the procedures used for estimation and
accumulation of cash reserves in accordance with this section; and
[(4)] (IV) A statement of the amount of reserves recommended in the study
and the amount of current cash for replacement reserves.
(2) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES ONLY TO A COOPERATIVE
HOUSING CORPORATION IN HOWARD COUNTY.
(II) TO THE EXTENT THAT A RESERVE STUDY CONDUCTED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION INDICATES A NEED TO BUDGET FOR RESERVES,
THE BUDGET SHALL INCLUDE THE CURRENT ESTIMATED REPLACEMENT COST FOR
CAPITAL COMPONENTS IF THE ESTIMATED REPLACEMENT COST IS GREATER THAN
$10,000 AS DETERMINED BY THE MOST RECENT RESERVE STUDY OR UPDATED
RESERVE STUDY.
(f) (1) (i) THIS PARAGRAPH DOES NOT APPLY TO A COOPERATIVE
HOUSING CORPORATION IN HOWARD COUNTY.
(II) Subject to subparagraph [(ii)] (III) of this paragraph, the
governing body of a cooperative housing corporation shall provide funds to the reserve in
accordance with the most recent reserve study and shall review the reserve study annually
for accuracy.
[(ii)] (III) If the most recent reserve study was an initial reserve
study, the governing body shall, within 3 fiscal years following the fiscal year in which the
initial reserve study was completed, attain the annual reserve funding level recommended
in the initial reserve study.
(2) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES ONLY TO A COOPERATIVE
HOUSING CORPORATION IN HOWARD COUNTY.
(II) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS PARAGRAPH,
THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION SHALL DEPOSIT
FUNDS TO THE RESERVE ACCOUNT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE MOST RECENT
RESERVE STUDY AND THE FUNDING PLAN REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (IV)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH ON OR BEFORE THE LAST DAY OF EACH FISCAL YEAR AND
SHALL REVIEW THE RESERVE STUDY ANNUALLY FOR ACCURACY.

SENATE BILL 777
(III) IF THE MOST RECENT RESERVE STUDY WAS AN INITIAL
RESERVE STUDY, THE GOVERNING BODY SHALL, WITHIN 10 FISCAL YEARS
FOLLOWING THE FISCAL YEAR IN WHICH THE INITIAL RESERVE STUDY WAS
COMPLETED, ATTAIN THE ANNUAL RESERVE FUNDING LEVEL RECOMMENDED IN
THE INITIAL RESERVE STUDY.
(IV) 1. THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION SHALL, IN CONSULTATION WITH A PERSON IDENTIFIED UNDER
SUBSECTION (D)(1) OF THIS SECTION, DEVELOP A FUNDING PLAN TO DETERMINE
HOW TO FULLY FUND THE RESERVES NECESSARY UNDER THIS SECTION.
2. IN DEVELOPING THE FUNDING PLAN UNDER THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH, THE GOVERNING BODY SHALL CONSIDER THE FOLLOWING
METHODS TO ACHIEVE THE RESERVE FUNDING UNDER THIS SECTION:
A. COMPONENT OR FULL FUNDING METHOD;
B. CASH FLOW METHOD;
C. BASELINE FUNDING METHOD;
D. THRESHOLD CASH FLOW METHOD; AND
E. OTHER FUNDING METHODS CONSISTENT WITH
GENERALLY ACCEPTED ACCOUNTING PRINCIPLES.
3. A FUNDING PLAN DEVELOPED UNDER THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH SHALL PRIORITIZE ADEQUATE AMOUNTS FOR REPAIR AND
REPLACEMENT OF COMMON ELEMENTS WITH CONSIDERATION GIVEN TO THE
HEALTH AND SAFETY OF MEMBERS OF THE COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION.
4. A GOVERNING BODY SHALL REVIEW PROGRESS
TOWARD COMPLIANCE WITH THE FUNDING PLAN DEVELOPED UNDER THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH AT EACH ANNUAL MEETING OF THE GOVERNING BODY.
[(2)] (3) The governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has the
authority to increase an assessment levied to cover the reserve funding amount required
under this section, notwithstanding any provision of the articles of incorporation, bylaws,
or proprietary lease restricting assessment increases or capping the assessment that may
be levied in a fiscal year.
Article – Real Property
11–109.2.

SENATE BILL 777 7
(b) (1) The annual budget shall provide for at least the following items:
[(1)] (I) Income;
[(2)] (II) Administration;
[(3)] (III) Maintenance;
[(4)] (IV) Utilities;
[(5)] (V) General expenses;
[(6)] (VI) Reserves; and
[(7)] (VII) Capital items.
(2) IN ADDITION TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, IN HOWARD COUNTY, THE ANNUAL BUDGET SHALL PROVIDE FOR
REPLACEMENT COST IF THE ESTIMATED REPLACEMENT COST IS GREATER THAN
$10,000 AS DETERMINED BY THE MOST RECENT RESERVE STUDY OR UPDATED
RESERVE STUDY.
(c) (1) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH DOES NOT APPLY TO A CONDOMINIUM IN
HOWARD COUNTY.
(II) Subject to [paragraph (2)] SUBPARAGRAPH (III) of this
[subsection] PARAGRAPH, the reserves provided for in the annual budget under subsection
(b) of this section for a residential condominium shall be the funding amount recommended
in the most recent reserve study completed under § 11–109.4 of this title.
[(2)] (III) If the most recent reserve study was an initial reserve study, the
governing body shall, within 3 fiscal years following the fiscal year in which the initial
reserve study was completed, attain the annual reserve funding level recommended in the
initial reserve study.
(2) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES ONLY TO A CONDOMINIUM IN
HOWARD COUNTY.
(II) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS PARAGRAPH AND
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE FUNDING PLAN UNDER § 11–109.4(F) OF THIS TITLE, THE
RESERVES PROVIDED FOR IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION FOR A RESIDENTIAL CONDOMINIUM SHALL:

SENATE BILL 777
1. BE THE FUNDING AMOUNT RECOMMENDED IN THE
MOST RECENT RESERVE STUDY OR UPDATED RESERVE STUDY COMPLETED UNDER §
11–109.4 OF THIS TITLE; AND
2. BE DEPOSITED IN THE RESERVE ACCOUNT ON OR
BEFORE THE LAST DAY OF EACH FISCAL YEAR.
(III) IF THE MOST RECENT RESERVE STUDY WAS AN INITIAL
RESERVE STUDY, THE GOVERNING BODY SHALL, WITHIN 10 FISCAL YEARS
FOLLOWING THE FISCAL YEAR IN WHICH THE INITIAL RESERVE STUDY WAS
COMPLETED, ATTAIN THE ANNUAL RESERVE FUNDING LEVEL RECOMMENDED IN
THE INITIAL RESERVE STUDY.
(IV) A RESIDENTIAL CONDOMINIUM SHALL REVIEW THE
RESERVE STUDY ANNUALLY FOR ACCURACY.
11–109.4.
(a) (1) In this section[, “reserve] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(2) “RESERVE study” means a study of the reserves required for future
major repairs and replacement of the common elements of a condominium that:
[(1)] (I) Identifies each structural, mechanical, electrical, and plumbing
component of the common elements and any other components that are the responsibility
of the council of unit owners to repair and replace;
[(2)] (II) States the normal useful life and the estimated remaining useful
life of each identified component;
[(3)] (III) States the estimated cost of repair or replacement of each
identified component; and
[(4)] (IV) States the estimated annual reserve amount necessary to
accomplish any identified future repair or replacement.
(3) “UPDATED RESERVE STUDY” MEANS, FOR THE COMMON
ELEMENTS SINCE THE PRIOR RESERVE STUDY WAS COMPLETED:
(I) ANALYZING ANY WORK PERFORMED;
(II) REVISING REPLACEMENT COST, REMAINING LIFE, AND
USEFUL LIFE ESTIMATES; AND

SENATE BILL 777 9
(III) IDENTIFYING:
1. WORK PERFORMED AND AMOUNTS SPENT; AND
2. WHETHER ANY MAINTENANCE CONTRACTS ARE IN
PLACE.
(b) This section applies only to a residential condominium.
(c) (1) This subsection applies only to a condominium established in:
(i) Prince George’s County on or after October 1, 2020;
(ii) Montgomery County on or after October 1, 2021; or
(iii) Any county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery
County on or after October 1, 2022.
(2) The governing body of the condominium shall have an independent
reserve study completed not less than 30 calendar days before the meeting of the council of
unit owners required under § 11–109(c)(16) of this title.
(3) The governing body shall have an updated reserve study completed
within 5 years after the date of the initial reserve study conducted under paragraph (2) of
this subsection and at least every 5 years thereafter.
(d) (1) (i) This paragraph applies only to a condominium established in
Prince George’s County before October 1, 2020.
(ii) If the governing body of a condominium has had a reserve study
conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall have an updated reserve
study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at least every 5
years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a condominium has not had a reserve
study conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall have a reserve study
conducted on or before October 1, 2021, and an updated reserve study at least every 5 years
thereafter.
(2) (i) This paragraph applies only to a condominium established in
Montgomery County before October 1, 2021.
(ii) If the governing body of a condominium has had a reserve study
conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall have an updated reserve
study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at least every 5
years thereafter.

SENATE BILL 777
(iii) If the governing body of a condominium has not had a reserve
study conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall have a reserve study
conducted on or before October 1, 2022, and an updated reserve study at least every 5 years
thereafter.
(3) (i) This paragraph applies only to a condominium established in any
county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery County before October 1, 2022.
(ii) If the governing body of a condominium has had a reserve study
conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall have an updated reserve
study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at least every 5
years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a condominium has not had a reserve
study conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall have a reserve study
conducted on or before October 1, 2023, and an updated reserve study at least every 5 years
thereafter.
(e) Each reserve study AND, AS APPLICABLE, UPDATED RESERVE STUDY
required under this section shall:
(1) Be prepared by a person who:
(i) Has prepared at least 30 reserve studies within the prior 3
calendar years;
(ii) Has participated in the preparation of at least 30 reserve studies
within the prior 3 calendar years while employed by a firm that prepares reserve studies;
(iii) Holds a current license from the State Board of Architects or the
State Board for Professional Engineers; or
(iv) Is currently designated as a reserve specialist by the Community
Association Institute or as a professional reserve analyst by the Association of Professional
Reserve Analysts;
(2) Be available for inspection and copying by any unit owner;
(3) Be reviewed by the governing body of the condominium in connection
with the preparation of the annual proposed budget; and
(4) Be summarized for submission with the annual proposed budget to the
unit owners.
(F) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A CONDOMINIUM IN
HOWARD COUNTY.

SENATE BILL 777 11
(2) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A CONDOMINIUM SHALL, IN
CONSULTATION WITH A PERSON IDENTIFIED UNDER SUBSECTION (E)(1) OF THIS
SECTION, DEVELOP A FUNDING PLAN TO DETERMINE HOW TO FULLY FUND THE
RESERVES NECESSARY UNDER THIS SECTION.
(3) IN DEVELOPING THE FUNDING PLAN UNDER THIS SUBSECTION,
THE GOVERNING BODY SHALL CONSIDER THE FOLLOWING METHODS TO ACHIEVE
THE RESERVE FUNDING UNDER THIS SECTION:
(I) COMPONENT OR FULL FUNDING METHOD;
(II) CASH FLOW METHOD;
(III) BASELINE FUNDING METHOD;
(IV) THRESHOLD CASH FLOW METHOD; AND
(V) OTHER FUNDING METHODS CONSISTENT WITH GENERALLY
ACCEPTED ACCOUNTING PRINCIPLES.
(4) A FUNDING PLAN DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
PRIORITIZE ADEQUATE AMOUNTS FOR REPAIR AND REPLACEMENT OF COMMON
ELEMENTS WITH CONSIDERATION GIVEN TO THE HEALTH AND SAFETY OF MEMBERS
OF THE CONDOMINIUM.
(5) A GOVERNING BODY SHALL REVIEW PROGRESS TOWARD
COMPLIANCE WITH THE FUNDING PLAN DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION AT
EACH ANNUAL MEETING OF THE GOVERNING BODY.
11B–112.2.
(c) (1) The annual budget shall provide for at least the following items:
[(1)] (I) Income;
[(2)] (II) Administration;
[(3)] (III) Maintenance;
[(4)] (IV) Utilities;
[(5)] (V) General expenses;
[(6)] (VI) Reserves; and

SENATE BILL 777
[(7)] (VII) Capital expenses.
(2) IN ADDITION TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, IN HOWARD COUNTY, THE ANNUAL BUDGET SHALL PROVIDE FOR
REPLACEMENT COST IF THE ESTIMATED REPLACEMENT COST IS GREATER THAN
$10,000 AS DETERMINED BY THE MOST RECENT RESERVE STUDY OR UPDATED
RESERVE STUDY.
(d) (1) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH DOES NOT APPLY TO A HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION IN HOWARD COUNTY.
(II) Subject to [paragraph (2)] SUBPARAGRAPH (III) of this
[subsection] PARAGRAPH, reserves provided for in the annual budget under subsection (c)
of this section shall be the funding amount recommended in the most recent reserve study
completed under § 11B–112.3 of this title.
[(2)] (III) If the most recent reserve study was an initial reserve study, the
governing body shall, within 3 fiscal years following the fiscal year in which the initial
reserve study was completed, attain the annual reserve funding level recommended in the
initial reserve study.
(2) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES ONLY TO A HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION IN HOWARD COUNTY.
(II) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS PARAGRAPH AND
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE FUNDING PLAN UNDER § 11B–112.3(F) OF THIS TITLE,
RESERVES PROVIDED FOR IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL:
1. BE THE FUNDING AMOUNT RECOMMENDED IN THE
MOST RECENT RESERVE STUDY OR UPDATED RESERVE STUDY COMPLETED UNDER §
11B–112.3 OF THIS TITLE; AND
2. BE DEPOSITED IN THE RESERVE ACCOUNT ON OR
BEFORE THE LAST DAY OF EACH FISCAL YEAR.
(III) IF THE MOST RECENT RESERVE STUDY WAS AN INITIAL
RESERVE STUDY, THE GOVERNING BODY SHALL, WITHIN 10 FISCAL YEARS
FOLLOWING THE FISCAL YEAR IN WHICH THE INITIAL RESERVE STUDY WAS
COMPLETED, ATTAIN THE ANNUAL RESERVE FUNDING LEVEL RECOMMENDED IN
THE INITIAL RESERVE STUDY.
(IV) A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION SHALL REVIEW THE
RESERVE STUDY ANNUALLY FOR ACCURACY.

SENATE BILL 777 13
11B–112.3.
(a) (1) In this section[, “reserve] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(2) “RESERVE study” means a study of the reserves required for future
major repairs and replacement of the common areas of a homeowners association that:
[(1)] (I) Identifies each structural, mechanical, electrical, and plumbing
component of the common areas and any other components that are the responsibility of
the homeowners association to repair and replace;
[(2)] (II) States the estimated remaining useful life of each identified
component;
[(3)] (III) States the estimated cost of repair or replacement of each
identified component; and
[(4)] (IV) States the estimated annual reserve amount necessary to
accomplish any identified future repair or replacement.
(3) “UPDATED RESERVE STUDY” MEANS, FOR THE COMMON
ELEMENTS SINCE THE PRIOR RESERVE STUDY WAS COMPLETED:
(I) ANALYZING ANY WORK PERFORMED;
(II) REVISING REPLACEMENT COST, REMAINING LIFE, AND
USEFUL LIFE ESTIMATES; AND
(III) IDENTIFYING:
1. WORK PERFORMED AND AMOUNTS SPENT; AND
2. WHETHER ANY MAINTENANCE CONTRACTS ARE IN
PLACE.
(b) (1) This section applies only to a homeowners association:
(i) That has responsibility under its declaration for maintaining and
repairing common areas; and
(ii) For which the total initial purchase and installation costs for all
components identified in subsection (a)(1) of this section is at least $10,000.

SENATE BILL 777
(2) This section does not apply to a homeowners association that issues
bonds for the purpose of meeting capital expenditures.
(c) (1) This subsection applies only to a homeowners association established
in:
(i) Prince George’s County on or after October 1, 2020;
(ii) Montgomery County on or after October 1, 2021; or
(iii) Any county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery
County on or after October 1, 2022.
(2) The governing body of the homeowners association shall have an
independent reserve study completed not more than 90 calendar days and not less than 30
calendar days before the meeting of the homeowners association required under §
11B–106.1(a) of this title.
(3) The governing body shall have an updated reserve study completed
within 5 years after the date of the initial reserve study conducted under paragraph (2) of
this subsection and at least every 5 years thereafter.
(d) (1) (i) This paragraph applies only to a homeowners association
established in Prince George’s County before October 1, 2020.
(ii) If the governing body of a homeowners association has had a
reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall have an
updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at
least every 5 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a homeowners association has not had a
reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall have a reserve
study conducted on or before October 1, 2021, and an updated reserve study at least every
5 years thereafter.
(2) (i) This paragraph applies only to a homeowners association
established in Montgomery County before October 1, 2021.
(ii) If the governing body of a homeowners association has had a
reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall have an
updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at
least every 5 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a homeowners association has not had a
reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall have a reserve
study conducted on or before October 1, 2022, and an updated reserve study at least every
5 years thereafter.

SENATE BILL 777 15
(3) (i) This paragraph applies only to a homeowners association
established in any county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery County before
October 1, 2022.
(ii) If the governing body of a homeowners association has had a
reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall have an
updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at
least every 5 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a homeowners association has not had a
reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall have a reserve
study conducted on or before October 1, 2023, and an updated reserve study at least every
5 years thereafter.
(e) Each reserve study AND, AS APPLICABLE, UPDATED RESERVE STUDY
required under this section shall:
(1) Be prepared by a person who:
(i) Has prepared at least 30 reserve studies within the prior 3
calendar years;
(ii) Has participated in the preparation of at least 30 reserve studies
within the prior 3 calendar years while employed by a firm that prepares reserve studies;
(iii) Holds a current license from the State Board of Architects or the
State Board for Professional Engineers; or
(iv) Is currently designated as a reserve specialist by the Community
Association Institute or as a professional reserve analyst by the Association of Professional
Reserve Analysts;
(2) Be available for inspection and copying by any lot owner;
(3) Be reviewed by the governing body of the homeowners association in
connection with the preparation of the annual proposed budget; and
(4) Be summarized for submission with the annual proposed budget to the
lot owners.
(F) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION IN HOWARD COUNTY.
(2) A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION SHALL, IN CONSULTATION WITH A
PERSON IDENTIFIED UNDER SUBSECTION (E)(1) OF THIS SECTION, DEVELOP A

SENATE BILL 777
FUNDING PLAN TO DETERMINE HOW TO FULLY FUND THE RESERVES NECESSARY
UNDER THIS SECTION.
(3) IN DEVELOPING THE FUNDING PLAN UNDER THIS SUBSECTION,
THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION SHALL CONSIDER THE FOLLOWING METHODS TO
ACHIEVE THE RESERVE FUNDING UNDER THIS SECTION:
(I) COMPONENT OR FULL FUNDING METHOD;
(II) CASH FLOW METHOD;
(III) BASELINE FUNDING METHOD;
(IV) THRESHOLD CASH FLOW METHOD; AND
(V) OTHER FUNDING METHODS CONSISTENT WITH GENERALLY
ACCEPTED ACCOUNTING PRINCIPLES.
(4) A FUNDING PLAN DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
PRIORITIZE ADEQUATE AMOUNTS FOR REPAIR AND REPLACEMENT OF COMMON
ELEMENTS WITH CONSIDERATION GIVEN TO THE HEALTH AND SAFETY OF MEMBERS
OF THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION.
(5) A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION SHALL REVIEW PROGRESS
TOWARD COMPLIANCE WITH THE FUNDING PLAN DEVELOPED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION AT EACH ANNUAL MEETING OF THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.